Hawaii statutes.
[§342I-34] Penalties. (a) For each
violation of this part, a violator shall be subject to a penalty of not more
than $10,000 for each separate offense. However, the failure to post the
notice required under section 342I-23, following a warning issued by an
authorized employee of the department, shall be subject to a fine up to $1,000
for each separate offense. Each day of each violation shall constitute a
separate offense. The fines imposed pursuant to this section shall be
cumulative.

(b) Remedies shall be by citations, by civil
action, or as provided under sections 342H-10 and 342H-11. [L 2000, c 173, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next